<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891003-0046 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-03-89.f2.A1045</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">50 CFR Part 228 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 90518-9118] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 0648-AC69 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Incidental Take of Marine Mammals </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>National Marine Fisheries Service (NOAA Fisheries), NOAA,Commerce.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule and request for comments.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>NOAA Fisheries is proposing regulations that would allowthe harassment of marine mammals during exploration for oil and gas inthe Chukchi Sea and the Beaufort Sea for the next 5 years. Any taking ofmarine mammals that results in more than harassment would be a violationof the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972 which allows an incidental,but not intentional, take of marine mammals if certain conditions are met.Two of the six species of marine mammals authorized for an incidental takeare considered depleted, and four are not depleted.These regulations do not permit the actual activities associated with exploration,but rather allow an incidental take of these marine mammals during exploration.The Department of the Interior is responsible for permitting activitiesassociated with oil and gas exploration. Through the preparation of an Evironmental Assessment, a finding was madethat the impact on populations of marine mammals will be negligible, andthere will be no unmitigable adverse impacts on the availability of thespecies for subsistence by Alaska natives. A copy of the EnvironmentalAssessment is available on request from the address below. On request, public hearings also will be held in Anchorage, Alaska andWashington, DC. The dates of the hearings will be publised in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Date: </T2>Comments on the proposed rule must be received by December4, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">A public hearing will be held in Barrow, Alaska on Friday, November10.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Comments should be sumitted to Nancy Foster, Director,Office of Protected Resources, National Marine Fisheries Service, 1335East-West Highway, Silver Spring, MD 20910. Send Comments on the collectionof information burden estimate to the Office of Information and RegulatoryAffairs, Project (0648-0151), Office of Management and Budget, Washington,DC 20503.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Margaret Lorenz, Protected SpeciesManagement Division, Office of Protected Resources, National Marine FisheriesService, 1335 East-West Highway, Silver Spring, MD 20910, 301-427-2322.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>Section 101(a)(5) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972 (MMPA) givesthe Secretary of Commerce (Secretary) authority to allow, on request byU.S. citizens who engage in a specified activity (other than commercialfishing) in a specified geographical region, the incidental (but not intentional)taking of small numbers of marine mammals. Permission may be granted fora period of 5 years or less. The taking of marine mammals is allowed only if NOAA Fisheries finds, basedon the best scientific evidence available, that the taking will have anegligible impact on the species or stocks and will not have an ``unmitigableadverse impact'' on the availability of the species or stock for subsistenceuses. Also, regulations must be published that include permissible methodsof taking and other means to ensure the least adverse impact on the speciesand its habitat and on the availability of the species for subsistenceuses. Also, the regulations must include requirements for monitoring andreporting. This request is for an incidental take of six species of marine mammals:the beluga whale, bowhead whale, gray whale, bearded seal, ringed seal,and spotted seal. Two of the species, the bowhead and gray whale, are considereddepleted under the MMPA and endangered under the Endangered Species Act(ESA). In 1986, both of these Acts were amended to allow incidental takingsof depleted, endangered, or threatened marine mammals. Previously, onlynon-depleted marine mammals could be taken under this exemption to theMMPA. On September 29, 1989, NOAA Fisheries and the U.S. Fish and WildlifeService, Department of the Interior, jointly published general regulationsimplementing the 1986 amendments. Among other things, the amendments revisedthe scope of the regulations, the definition of negligible impact, andadded a new definition for unmitigable adverse impact. Negligible impactis defined as ``an impact resulting from the specified activity that cannotbe reasonably expected to, and is not likely to, adversely affect the speciesthrough effects on annual rates of recruitment or survival.'' Unmitigableadverse impact means ``an impact resulting from the specified activity(1) that is likely to reduce the availability of the species to a levelinsufficient for a harvest to meet subsistence needs by (A) causing themarine mammals to abandon or avoid hunting areas, (B) directly displacingsubsistence users, or (C) placing physical barriers between the marinemammals and the subsistence hunters; and (2) that cannot be sufficientlymitigated by other measures to increase the availability of marine mammalsto allow subsistence needs to be met.''   <ITAG tagnum="84">Endangered Species Act</ITAG>Before the 1986 amendments to the MMPA and the ESA, the more restrictiveprovisions of the MMPA prevailed, and an incidental take of endangeredor depleted marine mammals could not be allowed even if the anticipatedtake would result in only negligible impacts. The new amendments allowa take of endangered animals under the MMPA, but additional authority isneeded to allow takings under the ESA.Under the ESA, Federal agencies are required to consult with NOAA Fisherieson any action authorized, funded or carried out by the agencies that mayaffect endangered or threatened species or critical habitat. After consultationwith the agencies, NOAA Fisheries issues a biological opinion which includesan assessment of impacts and a conclusion on whether the action is likelyto jeopardize the continued existence of endangered or threatened species.NOAA Fisheries addressed the activities covered in this proposed rule inbiological opinions conducted for Outer Continental Shelf Lease Sales inthe Arctic Region including all areas of the Beaufort Sea, Chukchi Seaand Hope Basin Planning Area. An updated opinion issued November 23, 1988,and covering the entire Arctic Region, concluded that leasing and explorationactivities are not likely to jeopardize the continued existence of anyendangered or threatened whales. However, because an incidental take ofthese species had not yet been authorized under the MMPA, the IncidentalTake Statement attached to the opinion did not include an authorized take.The statement will be amended when these proposed regulations, which wouldallow an incidental take under the MMPA, are final. Also, NOAA Fisherieswill issue a biological opinion on this authorization because the grantingof an incidental take of marine mammals is a Federal action that requiresa Section 7 ESA consultation.<ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Request</ITAG>The request for a take of bowhead and gray whales was received on February16, 1988 from a group of oil companies: Amoco Production Co., Inc.; ChevronU.S.A., Inc.; Exxon Co. U.S.A.; Shell Western Eandamp;P Inc.;, Unocal Corp.;and Western Geophysical Co. of America. An amended petition received February23, 1989, requested as incidental take exemption for four additional speciesof marine mammals, none of which are depleted.The petitioners describe the request for taking an incidental and unintentionalharassment of marine mammals during pre-lease and post-lease explorationfor oil and gas resources in Alaska State waters and on the Outer ContinentalShelf. They are requesting a take by harassment, and do not anticipateany lethal takes. The MMPA defines ``takes'' as harass, hunt, capture orkill, or attempt to harass, hunt, capture, or kill any marine mammal.Exploration activities will include geological and geophysical surveys,drilling of stratigraphic test wells, exploratory drilling for oil andgas, and associated support activities. Potential causes of taking arenoise, oil spills and physical obstruction. This request does not coverfuture development or production of offshore oil and gas fields. Also,the petition does not request a take of marine mammals during the periodin the spring when bowhead whales are migrating through the Chukchi Seaand the Beaufort Sea around Pt. Barrow (usually late March or early Aprilto early or mid June). An exemption is requested for 5 years.On April 13, 1988, NOAA Fisheries published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(53 FR 12170) a Notice of receipt of requestfor rulemaking from the oil companies and a request for information. Atthe end of the 90-day comment period, comments had been received from Alaskanative groups, conservation groups, Federal, State, and local governmentagencies, private industry and other interested parties.Based on the comments received and NOAA Fisheries review of the request,additional information was sought from the petitioners on August 18, 1988,concerning the anticipated levels of activity, the effects on marine mammals,plans for monitoring and reporting, and measures for mitigating any adverseimpacts on the availability of the species for subsistence. NOAA Fisheriesalso suggested that the request be amended to include the incidental takeof several non-depleted marine mammals since we believe they may be affectedby the activities associated with exploration; these species are the belugawhale, ringed seal, spotted seal and bearded seal.<ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Proposed Rule</ITAG>NOAA Fisheries proposes to allow an incidental take of marine mammals inthe Beaufort and Chukchi Seas from 1989-1994 by individuals who are conductingpre-lease and post-lease oil and gas exploratory activities. A taking willnot be allowed when bowhead whales are using the spring lead system tomigrate through the Chukchi Sea and the Beaufort Sea past Pt. Barrow. Theproposed regulations include requirements for monitoring and reportingand measures to effect the least practicable adverse impact on the speciesand its habitat and on the availability of the species for subsistenceuses. The regulations are proposed based on a finding that explorationin the Chukchi and Beaufort Seas may involve the taking (by harassment)of six species of marine mammals. However, NOAA Fisheries believes thatthe total impact of the taking will have a negligible impact on the speciesand on the availability of the species for subsistence uses. All activitiesmust be conducted in a manner that minimizes adverse effects on the speciesand their habitat. The proposed regulations require those who request aLetter of Authorization to submit a plan to monitor the effects on thepopulations of marine mammals that are present during exploratory activities.The plan and the person or persons designated to observe and record theeffects of exploration activities must be approved by NOAA Fisheries. Also,the applicant for an authorization must identify what measures have beentaken to minimize any adverse impacts on the availability of marine mammalsfor subsistence uses if the activity takes place in or near a traditionalsubsistence hunting area. Each request will be evaluated on the specificactivity and the specific location, and each authorization will identifyallowable methods or conditions that are specific to that activity andlocation. A report on all exploratory activities must be submitted to NOAAFisheries within 90 days after the completed activity. A notice of issuanceof Letters of Authorization will be published in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>Any substantive modifications of the Letterswill be subject to public review unless NOAA Fisheries determines thatan emergency exists whhich requires immediate action.A Letter of Authorization must be requested by each group or individualconducting an exploratory activity where there is the likelihood of takingby harassment of any of the six species of marine mammals considered inthis rule. The granting of each Letter will be based on a determinationthat the total level of taking by all applicants in any one year is consistentwith the estimated level used to make a finding of negligible impact anda finding of no unmitigable adverse impacts. If the level of activity ismore than anticipated, such as more support vessels or aircraft, more drillingunits, or more miles of geophysical surveys, NOAA Fisheries will reevaluateits findings to determine if they continue to be appropriate. The individualLetters of Authorization will include monitoring and reporting requirementsthat are specific to each activity.<ITAG tagnum="84">Description of Activity</ITAG>The petitioners have supplied information on the kinds and the level ofactivities they expect to occur over the next five years. NOAA Fisherieshas used this estimated level of activity as a basis for its findings.If requests for Letters of Authorization exceed the highest estimated levelof activity, NOAA Fisheries will reevaluate its findngs to determine ifthey continue to be appropriate before any Letters are issued.Activities that are covered in the request are geophysical surveys, exploratorydrilling and support activities. Geophysical surveys are divided into twoclasses: Deep seismic and shallow hazard. Both kinds of surveys use a ``reflective''method to acquire data. Both include an energy source that generates aseismic signal, hydrophones that receive the signal, and electronic equipmenton board a seismic vessel that amplifies and records the signal. Energysources used in deep seismic surveys release bursts of compressed air orwater. Sound sources in shallow hazard surveys operate at lower energylevels and generate less acoustic pressure than deep seismic surveys.The four principal forms of exploratory drilling structures currently inuse or under development for Arctic exploration are artificial islands,bottom-founded structures, drillships and semi-submersible vessels.The exploratory activities discussed in the petition are currently beingconducted in Arctic waters. Seismic surveys have been made in the Beaufortand Chukchi Seas since the 1960s. Exploratory drilling has not been conductedas yet in the Chukchi Sea, but has taken place in the Beaufort Sea.Marine seismic surveys operate only during the open-water season whichis variable. In the southern Chukchi Sea, open water may occur July throughmid-November and in the Beaufort and northern Chukchi Seas, open watermay occur from August through October. Often, there is no more than 60days of open water. The scope of the petition is limited to ``open-water''seismic surveys and does not include any on-ice survey activity near springlead systems. Seismic surveys and exploratory drilling will continue forat least the next 7 to 10 years. They will occur on tracts already leasedand those offered in future lease sales.Over the next 5 year, pre-lease survey activity (deep seismic) will occurin unleased portions of the Beaufort and Chukchi Seas. Pre-lease surveyswill likely be concentrated in the proposed sale areas during the openwater season. The industry estimates that the number of vessels conductingpre-lease and post-lease surveys in all areas of the Beaufort and ChukchiSea in any open-water season should not exceed six.The following number of trackline miles is anticipated in each area: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,p0,7/8,i1,s25,r25</C>  <H1>  </H1><H1> </H1> Beaufort Sea_Pre-lease Activity: <ITAG tagnum="1">OCS Sale 124: <D>1,500 trackline miles. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">State waters (Sales 52, 65, 68) <D>1,500 trackline miles. </D></ITAG>Chukchi Sea_Pre-lease Activity: <ITAG tagnum="1">Chukchi Sea OCS Sale 126 <D>4,000 trackline miles. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hope Basin OCS Sale 133 <D>1,500 trackline miles.</D></ITAG></ITAG> Post-lease surveys (usually shallow hazard) will take place as a resultof Lease Sale 97 in the Beaufort Sea, Lease Sale 109 in the Chukchi Seaand previous OCS Lease Sales in the Beaufort Sea (BF, 71 and 87). In theBeaufort Sea, surveys will take place in 345 square kilometers in the LeaseSale 97 area and 805 square kilometers in previously leased sales for atotal of 1,105 kilometers. In the Chukchi Sea, under the highest levelof anticipated activity, it is estimated that shallow-hazard seismic activitywill take place on about 73 tracts for a total of 13,479 trackline kilometers.During all years of exploration in the entire Arctic Region, Minerals ManagementService (MMS) predicts that shallow-hazard seismic activity will cover80,000 trackline kilometers. However, the level of activity consideredfor this exemption includes only the activities that will occur duringthe 5 years the exemption will be effective. Before drilling can begin, lessees must file an Outer Continental ShelfPlan of Exploration and Environmental Report with the Minerals ManagementService as well as an Application for Permit to Drill. The Plan of Explorationis reviewed by the State of Alaska for consistency with the Alaska CoastalManagement Program under the provisions of the Coastal Zone ManagementAct. Because only one Plan of Exploration has been filed with MMS for LeaseSale 97 in the Beaufort Sea, the information on exploratory drilling comesfrom the Final Environmental Impact Statement filed for the lease sale.The high case assumption (based on low, mean, and high assumptions) suggeststhat 24 exploratory wells and 11 delineation wells will be drilled from1989 through 1993 on tracts leased in Sale 97 and three previous sales.The mean case assumption suggests 10 exploratory and 4 delineation wells.There may be as many as 5 or as few as 2 drilling units operating duringany single year in the Beaufort Sea. In addition, two drilling units maybe operating each year in State waters of the Beaufort. Inshore drillingunits are usually bottom-founded structures. Generally, a well is not drilledon every block leased since one to three wells are normally drilled toprove a formation that may span a cluster of leases. In the Chukchi Sea (OCS Lease Sale 109), 351 blocks were leased. Althoughno plans of exploration have been filed with MMS, the high case assumptionsuggests that 33 exploratory and 40 delineation wells will be drilled from1989-1996. From 1989 through 1993, when the regulations will be in effect,21 exploratory and delineation wells may be drilled under the high-caseassumption. The mean case assumes 16 exploratory and 12 delineation wells.As few as two or as many as seven drilling units could be working eachyear in the Chukchi Sea. These estimates for drilling units are for bothfloating as well as bottom-founded units. No exploratory activity is anticipatedat this time in State waters of the Chukchi Sea. An appropriate drilling unit will be selected by the lessees when an applicationfor Permit to Drill is filed with MMS or the State of Alaska. Althoughthe level of support activities is speculative, supplies during the drillingseason will be transported to the drill ships by helicopters and supplyvessels. Bottom-founded units will be resupplied from barges. During 1989-1993,13 barge trips probably will be made to the Chukchi Sea. The first threeof the barge trips would take place in 1991. The high-case estimate suggestsup to 27 barge trips during the peak year of exploration. It is assumedthat an average of 3 helicopters will service an average of 2 drillingunits, and one flight per day per helicopter is estimated. In the Beaufort Sea, most of the equipment used in exploratory drillingwill arrive by barge. To date, annual barge traffic that supports onshoreand offshore oil and gas development in the North Slope area has rangedfrom 2 to 26 trips. Helicopter traffic is estimated at one trip per dayper well drilled. The Final Environmental Impact Statement (FEIS) estimatesthat it takes 90 days to drill and test a well, and it predicts 90 helicoptertrips in a year a well is drilled. However, Amoco's Plan of Exploration,which has been filed with MMS, suggests that two helicopter trips per wellwill take place each day, but it will take only 70 days to drill and testa well. The number of required support vessels for each drilling unit will dependon the type of characteristics of the unit and the sea-ice conditions.For drilling operations in open water, MMS requires the operator to maintainan emergency standby vessel to be in the immediate vicinity of the drillingunit to ensure evacuation of personnel in the event of an emergency. Dependingon ice conditions, two or more icebreaking vessels may be required to performice management tasks for the floating unit. Based on exploration planssubmitted for OCS Lease Sale 87 tracks, it is assumed that up to threeice management vessels would be used to support each floating unit in theBeaufort Sea. <ITAG tagnum="84">Biological Information </ITAG>The geographical area covered by the request is the continental shelf ofthe Arctic Ocean adjacent to Alaska. This area includes the waters andseabed of the Chukchi Sea off the northwest coast of Alaska, and the BeaufortSea off the northern coast of Alaska. This area encompasses all watersnorth of the Bering Strait that are east of the U.S.-Russia ConventionLine of 1867 and are within 200 miles of the northern coast of Alaska.Arctic Region Marine Mammals<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Bowhead Whale (</ITAG><T3>Balaena Mysticetus</T3>) The bowhead whale is the most northern of the great whales. The size ofthe Western Arctic population of this species has recently been estimatedto number 7,800 animals (IWC, in press). These whales migrate northwardin the spring from their wintering areas in the Bering Sea. They pass throughthe Bering Strait and eastern Chukchi Sea from late-March to early Junethrough open leads and polynyas in the shear zone between the shorefastice and the offshore pack ice. Their path varies in distance from shoredepending on water depth and coastal topography, and is often within afew kilometers at coastal promontories such as Cape Lisburne and PointBarrow. The lead system at Point Barrow is especially narrow, and all whalesare believed to funnel through the leads or broken pack ice near the Point.In the Beaufort Sea, the shorefast ice zone is broader and the leads areprogressively farther offshore as they extend eastward. Past Pt. Barrow,the leads begin to branch offshore and the migration corridor widens intomultiple lead systems as they extend toward Banks Island in Canada. Althoughactivities such as calving, socialization, and some active feeding occurin the spring, the main activity is migration. Bowhead whales are generally absent in the Chukchi Sea and the Alaska portionof the Beaufort Sea in the mid-summer. Although at least the southern ChukchiSea is relatively open, the northern Chukchi and Beaufort Seas are stillgenerally ice-covered until early August, or later in some years. The majorityof the population is feeding in Canadian waters from June through August.As early as the beginning of August, bowhead whales return to the easternAlaska Beaufort Sea, particularly the offshore waters which may be partof their summer feeding grounds. The path of the ensuring fall migrationis relatively broad across the Beaufort Sea shelf. Many whales follow nearshorepaths while others occur far offshore. Most whale sightings in the fallare in depths between 20 m and 50 m and from 10 to 50 km offshore. By early September, both feeding and migration activities occur in theAlaska Beaufort Sea. The best documented feeding area is east of BarterIsland during September, including the waters offshore of Demarcation Bay.Feeding bowheads have also been observed at numerous other areas alongthe Beaufort Sea coast, presumably where hydrographic conditions supportthe development of significant concentrations of zooplankton such as copepods,euphausiids, and mysids. Depending on ice conditions and proximity to freeze-up, the bowhead mayactively feed and migrate from September to early November. As the whalesleave the Beaufort Sea in the fall they pass into the Chukchi Sea. Theirmigration route past Pt. Barrow is less well known and may be less welldefined. Some whales apparently follow the edge of the pack ice west towardWrangel Island while others head southwest across open waters of the ChukchiSea toward the Chukchotsk Peninsula of Siberia. Feeding is not documentedin the Chukchi Sea but probably occurs, if less frequently, than in theAlaskan Beaufort Sea. Most movements observed by bowheads in Alaska waters of the Chukchi Seaappear to be purposeful, with little milling or resting. Eventually, thewhales pass out of the Arctic Region through the Bering Strait where theywill over-winter in the central and western Bering Sea among the brokenpack ice and polynyas until the next spring. Bowhead whales have no natural predators in the Arctic other than man.Bowhead whales are hunted by Eskimo whalers both on their spring and fallmigrations through Alaska waters. Native villages that hunt bowhead whalesin northern Alaska are Wales, Point Hope, Point Lay, Wainwright, Barrow,Nuiqsut, and Kaktovik. Strike quotas are allocated to each village throughan agreement with the Alaska Eskimo Whaling Commission, up to the totalstrikes allowed under a cooperative agreement with NOAA based on quotasset by the International Whaling Commission (IWC). Most villages conducttheir hunts in the spring in the open ice leads. However, Kaktovik andNuiqsut hunt only in the fall since the bowheads do not pass these villagesin the spring. Barrow hunts in both spring and fall if they have unusedstrikes remaining in their quota after their spring hunt, or are transferredunused strikes from other villages.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Gray Whales (</ITAG><T3>Eschrichtius Robustus</T3>) The northern Bering and Chukchi Seas are the main summer feeding groundsfor the California gray whale population. The Bering Strait is an importantmigratory corridor for gray whales moving north between late May and August,and returning to the Bering Sea from September to November on their wayto southern waters. Gray whales are regular residents in the Chukchi Seafrom June through October, although the majority of the population probablysummers south of the Bering Strait. From July through mid-October, somegray whales are found regularly as far north as Pt. Barrow, and a few occasionallytravel as far east as Canada. Present knowledge of the summer-fall distribution and abundance of graywhales is incomplete. Up to one-fourth of the total gray whale population,estimated at 21,113 (IWC in press), may enter the northern Chukchi Seato feed in the summer and early fall (July-October). They are known toinhabit coastal waters of the Siberian Peninsula as well as Alaskan waters.Gray whales have been observed feeding in the Chukchi Sea well into October.Most whales are found feeding in nearshore waters averaging 20.5 m in depthand within 14.5 km of shore (Moore <T3>et al.</T3>, 1986). Offshore feeding also occurs, but is less welldocumented. It is not known if these whales observed in the Chukchi Searepresent a resident summer feeding population or are transient whalesthat move between the Bering and Chukchi Seas during the summer. Gray whales normally avoid heavy ice conditions. They remain south of thepolar ice pack, and typically leave these northern waters ahead of freeze-up.Gray whales have few natural predators in the Arctic other than polar bearsand man. Polar bears are not a common predator, even though they are knownto feed on whale carcasses. There is little subsistence taking of graywhales by Alaska natives. A few have been taken over the years (averagingless than one whale a year), and they are not actively hunted by any ofthe northern Alaska villages. The few takes are usually in the fall bybowhead whalers seeking to supplement a poor season. The Soviets, however,harvest up to 179 gray whales annually under a subsistence harvest allocationfrom the IWC.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Other Marine Mammal Populations </ITAG>In addition to the bowhead and gray whale, there are 14 other species ofmarine mammals that inhabit the Beaufort and/or Chukchi Seas. Of these,four are endangered: the right, sei, humpback and fin whales. The rightand sei whales are rare in Arctic waters. The few that have been seen inthe Chukchi Sea are probably stray individuals well outside the normalranges of their populations. Humpback and fin whales are occasional inhabitantsof the Chukchi Sea, usually in low numbers. Both are at the northern edgeof their summer range when in the Chukchi Sea, and have been sighted onlyirregularly in the Alaska portion of the Chukchi.Although three other cetaceans, the minke whale, killer whale, and harborporpoise are present in Arctic waters, they are generally considered uncommon,and are more abundant in the Bering Sea. However, beluga whales (<T3>Delphinapterus leucas</T3>) are present in large numbers in Alaskawaters. There are an estimated 16,000 to 18,000 beluga whales in the Bering-Arcticpopulation off Alaska with an estimated 11,500 of these migrating to andfrom the Beaufort Sea each summer (Davis and Evans, 1982). The entire populationmigrates westward out of Canadian Arctic waters during the fall season.Their migration route is generally associated with the seasonal pack iceedge (Hazard, 1988) which varies in distance from shore year to year. Afew may inhabit or pass through coastal waters, but most are observed alongthe ice front. A second population of 1,500 to 2,500 beluga whales move into the ChukchiSea in early summer after the Beaufort Sea stock has passed through ontheir spring migration north. This second group summers in the KasegalukLagoon area. Both calving and feeding occur in the nearshore waters outsidethe lagoon. There is a subsistence take of beluga whales by Alaska natives.The average annual kill in Alaska is 365 with 93 taken in the Alaskan BeaufortSea and 150 from the Eastern Chukchi Sea (Hazard 1988). In addition to whales and porpoises, four species of seals inhabit theArctic Region: the bearded seal, ribbon seal, ringed seal and spotted seal.While the ribbon seal is considered uncommon, the ringed seal (<T3>Phoca hispida</T3>) is the most abundant and widely distributed marinemammal in the Beaufort Sea (Frost <T3>et al</T3>., 1987; 1988b). Although there is not a good estimate ofits abundance or distribution during the open water season, it is widelydistributed in Arctic Alaska with an estimated population size of 1 to1.5 million animals (Kelly 1988a). The Chukchi Sea is regarded as betterringed seal habitat than either the Beaufort or Bering Sea. Ringed sealsare generlaly considered year-round residents of the seasonal shortfast-icezone throughout their range, but there is an influx of seals through theBering Strait into the Chukchi Sea in May and June. Nonbreeding subadultsare believed to remain offshore except for periods in the spring and fallwhen they move into the outer edges of the shorefast ice to haul out (Kelly1988a). There is a subsistence take of ringed seals by Alaska natives.The estimated current total annual take in Alaska exceeds 3,000 (Kelly1988a). The Eskimo Walrus Commission records the species and number ofall seals taken in five villages in the Bering Strait and Yukon-Kuskokwimregions. Bearded seals (<T3>Erignathus barbatus</T3>) are the second most abundant pinniped inArctic waters off Alaska, estimated to number about 250,000 to 300,000(Kelly 1988b). Their overall summer distribution is quite broad with majorconcentrations in the Chukchi Sea in association with the edge of the polarpack ice. Since they are benthic feeders, they are limited to shelf areasless than 200 meters depth, and prefer depths of 25 to 50 meters. Thereis a subsistence take of bearded seals by Alaska natives. In recent years,records have not been kept consistently, but between August 1985 and June1986, 791 bearded seals were harvested from several villages in the BeringStrait region (Kelly 1988b). The spotted seal (<T3>Phoca largha</T3>) is an ice-associated species closely related tothe harbor seal. They inhabit broken pack ice in the winter and move tocoastal habitats in the summer when the ice retreats. They migrate intothe Chukchi and Beaufort Seas in the summer, and overwinter in the BeringSea. The total Bering Sea population is estimated at 200,000 to 250,000(Quakenbush, 1988). The percentage of the population occupying the Chukchiand Beaufort Seas is unknown. They are more numerous in the Chukchi Seawhere major haulouts are known at Kasegaluk Lagoon. They are common inthe coastal waters in the vicinity of Peard Bay especially near the mountof the Kugrua River. In the Beaufort Sea, an estimated 1,000 seals haulout on beaches, barrier islands, and remote sandbars at river deltas, mainlyin the western Beaufort Sea. Known haulouts are at the Colville River Delta,Oarlock Island in Dease Inlet, and at the mouth of the Piasuk River inSmith Bay (Oliver, 1987), Spotted seals are taken in subsistence harvestsby Alaska natives especially in the Bering Strait and Yukon-Kuskokwim regions.From 1966 to 1976, Alaska's spotted seal harvest ranged from 850 to 3,600per year and averaged about 2,400 annually (Lowry 1984). From September1985 to June 1986, the combined harvest from five villages was 986 (Iya,unpublished data). <T3>Walruses and Polar Bears.</T3> Polar bears are common in the ArcticRegion. Walrus are seen only occasionally. The U.S. Fish and Wildlife Servicehas jurisdiction over these species, and will determine whether these specieswill be affected by oil and gas exploration in the Beaufort and ChukchiSeas.<ITAG tagnum="84">Studies of Effects of Exploration on Marine Mammals </ITAG>In the past 5 years, several studies have been conducted on the possibleeffects of OCS activities on bowhead and gray whales. Although studieson the effects of oil on marine mammals have continued using baleen fromdead specimens (Geraci and St. Aubin 1986), none has been conducted onliving baleen whales. The effects of noise disturbance of bowhead whalesfrom industrial activities was studied during a 5-year program in the CanadianBeaufort Sea (Richardson and Green 1983, Richardson et al. 1985a, b, 1986,1987). Two recent studies investigated noise disturbance of bowhead whalesin Alaskan waters (LGL 1987, Miles et al. 1987). Research specific to gray whales and energy exploration include a studyby Kent et al (1983) on the responses of migrating gray whales to naturaloil seeps in southern California and a study by Malme et al (1983 and 1984)on the potential effects of underwater noise from petroleum industry activitiesoff the California coast.Although studies have been conducted on the beluga whale's reaction toaircraft and certain kinds of boats (Richardson and Green 1987, Fraker1978, and Fraker and Fraker 1979), there is no information on the species'reaction to seismic vessels or other industrial activities.There have been several studies by Smith and Geraci (1975 and 1977) ofthe consequences of ringed seals coming into contact with crude oil. However,other than studies regarding the effects of on-ice seismic surveys on ringedseals, there are no disturbance studies or other behavioral observationsthat document the reactions of ringed, bearded, or spotted seals to industrialactivities.Noise Disturbance StudiesMany of the sounds produced by industrial activities are at low frequencies(below 1000 Hz) which is also the range of most bowhead whale vocalizations.Such low-frequency noises could travel long distances to waters used bybowhead whales for migration and feeding in spring and fall.There has been little opportunity to assess directly the impacts of industrialactivities on bowhead whales in Alaska waters because seasonal drillingrestrictions were imposed for the first three Beaufort Sea Federal oiland gas lease sales and because most prior OCS activities in Arctic Alaska(all of which are still in the exploration phase) have occurred in theBeaufort Sea during the winter when bowhead whales are not present. Duringthe spring, the ice leads used by the migrating whales are offshore andaway from any gravel islands where most Beaufort Sea wells have been drilledto date, and exploratory drilling in the spring lead systems has not occurred.Recently, exploration at a few drilling locations has been permitted duringthe fall migration of bowhead whales. Most of these locations have alsobeen shoreward of the main migration corridor. In 1986, Shell Western conductedexploratory drilling during the beginning of the fall migration, and Unocalsubsequently drilled an exploratory well during the migration. The twowells which were located in the nearshore migration path of the bowheadwhales, were drilled using a drillship, an icebreaker and icebreaking supportvessels. Drill-associated noises were monitored to determine their effectson the migrating whales (LGL 1987).Data from these studies suggested that migrating bowhead whales avoidedand could have been displaced by the offshore drilling operation. No whaleswere sighted closer than 9.5 km from the drillship, and few were sightedcloser than 15 km (LGL 1987). Significant numbers of bowhead whales passedsouth of the rig as well as north of it. One whale was tracked for 6.8hours while it travelled 32 km. The whale moved in an arc around the drillingoperation maintaining a distanct of about 23-27 km from the drillship.Bowhead whales observed between 15 and 30 km from the drillship apparentlydid not exhibit ``strong'' (i.e., definite responses which usually involvedmajor changes in respiration, surfacing, and dive cycles) behavioral responses.There was no evidence that the drilling operation (including the supportvessels) act as a barrier to migration (LGL 1987). However, during thestudy period, ice conditions were light and animals could pass north orsouth of the rig. No evidence exists to determine if whales would or wouldnot approach an operating rig to continue their migration during heavyice conditions if the rig was located in the migration path.Disturbance responses of bowhead whales summering in the Canadian Beaufortto industrial activities have been the focus of a 5-year study (Richardson1981, 1982, 1985; Richardson et al. 1985a,b, 1986, 1987). Sound sources,besides ambient noise, included geophysical seismic exploration, drillingand associated machinery noise, dredging, icebreaker activity, boat andaircraft traffic, and construction of gravel islands or other offshorestructures. Behavior near actual and simulated activities associated withoffshore oil exploration was compared with presumbly undisturbed behavior.In general, bowhead whales showed considerable tolerance of ongoing noisefrom dredging or drilling, but tended to react more strongly to a movingor rapidly changing noise source such as an approaching boat or aircraftor the startup of noise sources (Richardson et al. 1985a,b, 1986, 1987).In a study by Miles et al. (1987), a simulation model was used to investigatethe effects on bowhead whales of noise associated with a drilling operation.Roughly half of the whales in this study showed avoidance responses toindustrial sounds which had a 30 dB signal to noise (S:N) ratio. A smallerproportion of the whales observed by Richardson et al. reacted when theS:N was about 20 dB, which would occur at greater ranges than those estimatedby Miles et al., and a few bowhead whales may react with even lower signalto noise ratios.In the Canadian Beaufort Sea, responses of whales to moving boats was themost consistent and second-most pronounced of all disturbance factors tested(Montague 1985). In most cases, bowhead whales oriented away from a movingvessel up to 4 km away and actively swam away from vessels 2 km or lessaway.In the Richardson studies (1982, 1985a), there was no clear relationshipbetween the size of the vessel and the distance of the response. The whalesceased to avoid the vessel when it passed out of range, but they may haveremained scattered for longer periods. Collisions between bowhead whalesand vessels can be avoided if vessels take appropriate steps or if thewhales can detect the vessels.The reaction of bowhead whales to aircraft is more variable than to vesselnoise. Most reactions to fixed-wing aircraft occur at altitudes of lessthan 1,500 feet (Richardson et al. 1985a). Reaction to helicopters mayhave a similar area of influence (M. Dahlheim, NOAA Fisheries, pers. comm.).Beluga whales respond to noise and vessel traffic based on the ``behavior''of the sound source. For example, Fraker and Fraker (1979) reported thatwhales closely approached stationary operations such as barge camps anddredges, but in shallow waters were frightened by moving barges at distancesof up to 2.4 km. Belugas often approached within a few kilometers of drillingoperations on artificial islands and even closer to drilling ships (Fraker1977, Fraker and Fraker 1979). Belugas also respond to helicopters flyingat altitudes below 150m (Fraker 1978, Fraker and Fraker 1979). As withvessels and fixed-wing aircraft, helicopters seemed to affect feeding belugasless than those not feeding (Hazard 1988).Studies and Probabilities of Oil SpillsMMS has concluded that the probability of an oil spill resulting from ablowout during exploratory drilling is extremely low (Martin 1986). Todate, there has been no oil spilled as a result of a blowout during exploratorydrilling on the U.S. outer continental shelf. MMS cites several studiesof offshore drilling statistics that indicate the probability of a blowoutduring offshore exploration on the U.S. OCS is around 0.64 percent or about1 blowout per 156 wells drilled.MMS cites legal authorities and operational procedures (Murrell et al.1987) that are supposed to be in place to ensure safe drilling practiceson OCS leases. Such authorities include operational requirements containedin regulations, OCS Operating Orders, lease stipulations, inspection requirements,and conditions of approval of Exploration Plans, Applications for a Permitto Drill, and Critical Operations and Curtailment Plans.However, if an oil spill should occur during exploration activities fromeither a blowout or an operational discharge, the conditional probabilities(expressed as percent chance) that an oil spill will contact a certainbowhead whale habitat (i.e., spring or fall migration corridors, feedingareas) within 3 to 30 days have been calculated to range from nil (lessthan 0.5 percent) to nearly 100 percent depending on spill location andseason (MMS 1985, 1987a,b).Although there are no data on effects of oil on bowhead whales in the openocean, Albert (1981) speculated that the most likely adverse effects ofoil contact to bowhead whales would be (1) cojunctivitis and corneal eyeinflammation leading to reduced vision and possibly blindness, (2) developmentof skin ulcerations from existing eroded areas on the skin surface withsubsequent possibility of bacteremia, (3) compromising of tactile hairsas sensory structures, and (4) development of bronchitis or pneumonia asthe result of inhaled irritants.While marine mammals may feed on contaminated prey, it appears to be difficultfor them to consume enough oil in this manner to be poisoned by absorbedhydrocarbons. As in humans, cetaceans could develop lung damage from aspiratingregurgitated hydrocarbons (Geraci and St. Aubin 1986).Hansen (1985) reviewed the literature on the potential effects of oil spillson whales and other marine mammals, and suggested that the level of effectswould be related to the degree of exposure of a cetacean to an oil spill.Baleen whales, such as the bowhead and gray whale, may be less likely toavoid oil slicks than more mobile small cetaceans, and the bowhead whales'association with sea-ice may also provide less ability or opportunity foravoidance than for subarctic species (Geraci and St. Aubin, 1986).Other effects of oil spills on whales may include reduction in availabilityof food within localized areas near the spill site and in areas where theoil slick occurred. However, Richardson (1987) suggests that it is unlikelythat accidental oil spills would have a significant or lasting effect onzooplankton in the study area, or on the availability of zooplankton tobowheads. Nonetheless, there may be uncertain long-term effects of oilingestion and hydrocarbon accumulation.Although no research has been conducted specifically on the effects ofoil pollution on beluga whales, possible effects of oil on odontocetes(tooth whales) include oil fouling, such as blocking of the digestive track,damage to eyesight or skin, poisoning from ingestion or inhalation, chronictoxicity from exposure to components passed through the food chain, changesin prey populations due to pollution, and reduction in suitable habitat(Hazard 1988). Some cetaceans can detect and avoid oil slicks. In one experiment,bottlenose dolphins avoided surfacing in a slick of darkened mineral oilafter two or three initial surfacings in the oil (Geraci and St. Aubin1982). Although Geraci et al (1983) pointed out that while visual and tactileperceptions led dolphins to avoid oil in an undisturbed and stress-freesetting, Free-ranging dolphins may enter slicks because of urgency or becauseof their inability to detect oil in rough or turbid waters or where preyis very dense. It seems likely that oil could be particularly difficultto detect in Arctic waters because of the widespread ice cover and extendedhours of darkness in winter. Physical and biological factors directingthe movements of belugas, such as the location of leads and polynyas inthe spring and the ice front in autumn, the use of estuaries in the summer,and association with seasonal fish runs, could affect the whales' abilityto avoid pollution.Effects on ringed seals of contact with crude oil were reported to includeeye irritation, kidney lesions and possible liver damage (Geraci and Smith1975, Smith and Geraci 1975). Six ringed seals that were immersed for 24hours in crude oil shortly after capture survived but showed evidence ofthe above pathological conditions. Three ringed seals held in captivityin Guelph, Ontario, for a longer period all died within 71 minutes of immersion,apparently as the combined result of stress and exposure to oil (Smithand Geraci 1975). It was suggested that vulnerability of ringed seals toenvironmental disturbances such as oil spills would vary with conditionof the animals; older seals and those in poor nutritional health wouldbe most vulnerable (Kelly 1988).<ITAG tagnum="85">Effects of Exploration on Marine Mammals and on Subsistence Uses</ITAG>BowheadWhalesThe primary concern of NOAA Fisheries in the Arctic Region is the bowheadwhale. The entire population of bowhead whales is susceptible to impactsin this area during their spring migration through nearshore leads. Inthe fall, a large portion of the bowhead whale population may again beexposed to distrubance from exploration noise when they migrate throughthe Arctic Region both nearshore and offshore with the pack ice.To date, the exposure of bowhead whales to the effects of OCS activitieshas largely been confined to the Canadian Beaufort Sea. In Alaska waters,limited drilling during the fall migration of the whales has only recentlybegun.The ability of the bowhead whale to accommodate increasing industrial disturbanceis uncertain. Some accommodation undoubtedly can occur, but the level ofstress imposed on the species as a result cannot be predicted. A decreaseduse by bowhead whales of the Canadian Beaufort Sea industrial areas, asevidenced from aerial surveys during the summer, has been noted (Richardson<T3>et al</T3>. 1985a,b, 1986, 1987). However, changes in bowhead whaleabundance has also occurred outside the main industrial area. One suggestedcause for the decreased use is the effect of increased disturbance fromindustrial activity that began in the early 1970's and significantly increasedsince 1980. Variation in food availability (zooplankton concentrations)may also have been involved.Present and proposed OCS exploratory and development activities in theArctic Region may eventually adversely affect the successful life cycleof bowhead whales. At present, we are unable to predict what these tolerancethresholds might be, but we do not believe the foreseeable additive effectsof previous and planned sales should exceed this level of concern. Continuedefforts to monitor distribution patterns and indicators of population health,such as reproductive success, recruitment, growth rates and behavior areimportant to assure the combined effects from all OCS activities are notlikely to have more than a negligible impact on the bowhead whale population.Large or widespread noise disturbance along the spring or fall migrationpaths or in feeding areas could affect bowhead whales by interfering withsuccessful feeding, migration, or other behavioral activities. The rangeor level of noise required to produce these effects depends on the locationand source of noise, and on the acoustic propagation properties of theenvironment. Although some impacts to individuals may occur, we do notbelieve proposed exploratory activities will produce noise levels expectedto reduce appreciably the likelihood of survival and recovery of the bowheadwhales by reducing the reproduction, numbers, or distribution of the species.This conclusion is based on the assumption that exploratory activitieswill not occur within the spring lead system during the bowhead migration.<T3>Subsistence. </T3>Bowhead whales return to the eastern Alaskan BeaufortSea as early as the beginning of August to begin their fall migration outof the Beaufort Sea. Unlike the spring hunt in the Chukchi Sea, the iceconditions in the Beaufort Sea progress from open water to freeze-up throughthe hunting season and successful hunting often depends both on favorableweather and ice conditions. Restrictions on drilling in the Beaufort Seaduring the bowhead whale fall migration were imposed by MMS and the Stateof Alaska in response to concerns that drilling might disrupt the fallmigration. The open-water season for exploration activities in the BeaufortSea coincides with the hunting season for the villages of Kaktovik andNuiqsut. Most exploratory drilling has been shoreward of the main migrationcorridor. Also, drilling is limited to above threshold depth until 50 percentof the whales have passed the drilling location. Also, any drilling thatoccurs during the fall migration requires monitoring to determine the effectsof noise associated with exploration.In Kaktovik, hunting activities generally occur within 10 miles of thecoastline, but sometimes as much as 20 miles offshore (Jackobson and Wentworth,1982). According to village elders, Kaktovik was a pre-historic whalingsite. However, Kaktovik's most recent whaling began in 1964. From 1973to 1988, Kaktovik landed at least one whale every year except in 1975,1985 and 1987 for a total of 27 whales. Fall whaling in Nuiqsut occursalong the coast as far east as the Canning River with Flaxman Island asthe most heavily used site. Nuiqsut has been a whaling community since1973, and landed a whale in 1973, 1982, 1986 and 1987.These and other whaling communities are concerned that heavy boat and airtraffic and associated noise cause whales to abandon traditional migratorypaths; that whalers are prevented from scouting for whales because of heavyboat traffic; and that industry boats moving directly in the path of whalingcrews prevent the pursuit of a whale. Concern has been expressed by whalersbecause Kaktovik did not land a whale in 1985 when there was considerableseismic activity occurring during the fall bowhead whale migration and,again, in 1987 when both seismic and drilling activities occurred duringthe migration. However, in 1986 when Kaktovik landed three whales and in1988 landed one, exploratory activities also were taking place in the vicinityof the hunting grounds. Bad ice conditions in 1985 and bad weather conditionsin 1987 may have prevented whaling crews from reaching their traditionalhunting grounds. Data gathered during aerial surveys in 1985 indicate thatwhales were present in the traditional hunting areas that year. On theother hand, 1986 was an exceptionally good ice year and a good year forhunting.In 1986, the first Oil/Whalers Working Group's ``Cooperative Program forthe Beaufort Sea'' provided for the coordination of oil and gas industryexploration activities in the Beaufort Sea with the Eskimo subsistencehunt of bowhead whales. This cooperative agreement was renegotiated forthe 1987 and the 1988 season. These agreements are entered into by theAlaska Eskimo Whaling Commission (AEWC) and exploration companies thatare operating in the Beaufort Sea at the time of the fall bowhead whalemigration. The purpose of the agreement is to ensure that exploratory drillingdoes not interfere with or restrict the fall hunt of bowhead whales bythe residents of the villages of Kaktovik and Nuiqsut. The town of Barrowalso hunts for bowhead whales in the fall, but so far has not been a partyto the agreement since it can hunt only if there is an unused quota available.Agreements are conditioned on the renewal of a NOAA-AEWC Memorandum ofUnderstanding which is based on the satisfaction of NOAA that the cooperativeprogram is consistent with and not prohibited under relevant provisionsof the law. Basically the agreement provides for reliable communicationamong crews on the whaling and industry vessels, and includes a processfor resolving disputes.Gray WhalesIn Arctic waters, gray whales are most likely to be encountered in thesouthern Chukchi Sea and the Bering Strait region, and would be affectedmust by oil and gas exploration activities in those areas. As much as one-fourthof the gray whale population may enter the northern Chukchi Sea throughthe Bering Strait. Although some individuals may suffer disturbances orother impacts from the proposed activities, due to the good overall conditionof the gray whale population and to its widespread distribution in theBering and Chukchi Seas, such impacts are not likely to be more than negligible.However, additive impacts that could result from past and future OCS activitiesin the Arctic Region, the Bering Sea, and in other regions outside Alaska,may have the potential to affect the population adversely. Annually, thegray whale population migrates by or through at least eight oil lease areasin U.S. waters alone (Rice et al., 1984). Continued monitoring of the healthof the gray whale population and the effects of OCS activities in theseareas is necessary to assess whether the combined impacts are affectingthe gray whales adversely.<T3>Subsistence. </T3>There is little subsistence take of gray whales byAlaska natives although a few have been taken over the years (averagingless than one whale a year). The few takes are usually in the fall by bowheadwhalers seeking to supplement a poor season. Since gray whales are notactively hunted by any of the northern Alaska villages, exploratory activitieswill not limit their availability for subsistence uses.Beluga WhalesThis species occurs in all of the Alaska OCS oil and gas lease sale areas.During the ice-free months, the largest concentrations are found in theeastern Beaufort Sea north of Canada although a few have been seen offBarter Island. The spring migration passes through the Chukchi Sea andthe Beaufort Sea lease areas. Major summer concentrations occur in theNorth Aleutian Basin, Norton Basin, Hope Basin and Barrow Arch. Duringthe fall, many belugas pass through the lease sale areas of the BeaufortSea although this westward migration takes place primarily offshore. Informationon sensitivity to oil and gas activities is limited. However, because theyform dense aggregations, their populations as a whole may be significantlyaffected by local degradation of the environment. The effects of habitatchanges on belugas could take various forms including direct mortality,displacement, increased stress or illness, changes in reproductive success,changes in fat reserves or energy expenditures, and changes in the abilityto communicate, navigate or locate prey (Hazard 1988). Marine mammals mayabandon areas as their habitat deteriorates, or they may exhibit high sitetenacity. Belugas return to estuaries in northern Quebec every year despitesevere overhunting that has reduced population levels. Although belugasin Kotezebue Sound (Chukchi Sea) are intensely hunted, and in the MackenzieDelta (Canada) are hunted and exposed to dramatic increases in vessel trafficand industrial noise, they return each year. In other areas, where vesseltraffic has increased, belugas have disappeared. Thus, site tenacity maybetter reflect the critical value of the habitat than the level of human-imposedstress (Hazard 1988).<T3>Subsistence. </T3>Belugas have never been observed in large numbersduring the summer in coastal waters of the Beaufort Sea, and there havebeen only a few nearshore sightings in the autumn (Frost, Lowry and Burns1988). In the Chukchi Sea, the spring migration of belugas generally isin association with the bowhead migration, and the proposed regulationsdo not authorize a take during the bowhead whale spring migration. However,beluga whales are present in the summer in some coastal areas of the ChukchiSea where they are hunted for subsistence. Although no exploration activitiesare planned in State waters of the Chukchi Sea, offshore exploration shouldbe sited and timed so that belugas are not displaced or prevented fromentering these areas.Bearded, Ringed and Spotted SealsPotential adverse effects of noise disturbances on ringed seals, particularlythose associated with on-ice seismic activities in the Arctic, were consideredby Burns and Kelly (1982) and Kelly et al. (1986). Displacement of sealsfrom breathing holes and lairs was found to occur in local areas, but wasnot significant to the population. Effects on ringed seals of contact withoil was discussed previously. Although bearded seals would likely showthe same effect of contact with oil as ringed seals, potentially greaterharm to bearded seals may result from development activities that adverselyaffect their benthic foods. Petroleum oil spills have resulted in mortalityof benthic invertebrates, including bivalve molluscs.No studies have been conducted on the effects of industrial noise and otherhuman activities on bearded seals. Bearded seals generally appear to beless readily disturbed by human activities than are many other pinnipeds(Kelly 1988), and Burns (1981) noted that bearded seals are less wary inthe spring than in winter.Although the long-term effects of oil and the effects of oil on the specificfood chain of spotted seals are not known, the effects of energy explorationon spotted seals probably are the same as for ringed and bearded seals.<T3>Subsistence.</T3> Most of the subsistence take of bearded, ringed andspotted seals occurs in the Bering Strait Region of Alaska where explorationactivity will be limited to pre-lease geophysical surveys in the Hope BasinArea. Also, most seals are widely distributed at sea during the open waterseason, the time exploratory activities considered in this rulemaking willtake place.<ITAG tagnum="84">Conclusions</ITAG>The Marine Mammal Commission, in response to NOAA Fisheries' request forcomments, concurs with the petitioners' judgement that noise and disturbancefrom exploration are likely to have no more than temporary and localizedeffects on bowhead and gray whale behavior and movements, and that theseeffects are not likely to affect the survival or productivity of the whalesor have more than temporary and localized effects on the availability ofwhales for native subsistence hunting. However, the Commission notes thatthe survival and productivity of the bowhead whale could be affected ifnoise or disturbance interfered with breeding, caused increased energyexpenditures and food requirements, caused animals to avoid or abandonimportant or breeding areas, or disrupted feeding for more than a few hoursor days in more than a single summer feeding season.NOAA Fisheries agrees with this assessment and concludes that noise anddisturbance will not adversely affect the marine mammal species througheffects on annual rates of recruitment or survival if certain conditionsare met.The Commission also notes that noise and disturbance from exploration andrelated activities are not likely to have significant adverse effects onsurvival, productivity, or availability to native subsistence hunters dueat least partially to the fact that activities would be limited in timeand space. That is, an activity that interferes with feeding or breeding,or increases energy expenditures, for short periods may have negligibleeffects on survival or productivity, whereas the same activity might causemore than negligible impacts if it occurred in the same area year afteryear. Therefore, it is important to recognize that this does not mean thatdisturbance and noise from development and production activities, whichcould occur in certain locations for many years, also would have negligibleeffects.NOAA Fisheries agrees with the Marine Mammal Commission that noise anddisturbance will not have an unmitigable adverse impact on the availabilityof marine mammals for subsistence needs if certain conditions are met.The Commission concurs with the petitioners that during exploration activitiesthere is a low probability of oil spills occurring and contacting eitherbowhead or gray whales or habitats important to their survival or productivity.However, a low probability of occurrence does not, by itself, provide justificationfor concluding that oil spills would have negligible impacts. The potentialimpact of an oil spill is independent of its probability of occurrence,and the possible severity of that impact should be factored into the negligibleimpact determination. In this case, it may be reasonable to assume that,because the possibility of a spill occurring is so small, there is no needto consider the possible impacts of a spill, not that the impacts wouldbe negligible if in fact a spill did occur.The final regulations implementing the 1986 amendments to the MMPA andESA include a discussion on weighing the likelihood of occurrence againstthe severity of the potential impact. The legislative history of the 1986amendments states: ``the degree of certainty of occurrence required inthese judgements should be inversely proportional to the resultant harmto the overall population.'' NOAA Fisheries agrees with the Commissionthat while there is a low probability of oil spills occurring and contactingwhales or seals or habitats important to their survival or productivity,the impacts would not be negligible if an oil spill occurred. Yet, NOAAFisheries believes a finding of negligible impact is appropriate becauseof the low probability of an oil spill during the exploration phase.The Commission adds, ``the judgement that exploration and related activitieswould have negligible effects on marine mammals, especially the bowheadwhale, is based on several assumptions. One is that changes in diving andmovement patterns in response to ship and aircraft operations do not affectbreeding or feeding in ways that would have either immediate or long-termeffects on survival or productivity. Another assumption is that noise anddisturbance would not cause whales to abandon or avoid traditional breedingareas, feeding areas, migratory routes, and native hunting grounds. Theassumption is also made that there are alternative feeding areas, breedingareas, migratory routes, and hunting grounds that can be used with littleor no effect on survival, productivity, or availability of whales to subsistencehunters.''The Commission believes that although these assumptions may be reasonable,their validity has not been verified. This would require accurate determinationsof migration routes and the knowledge of age- or size-specific survivaland reproductive rates of the bowhead, gray and beluga whales. Monitoringprograms need to be established that are capable of detecting behavioralchanges in whales that may be caused by exploration activities. NOAA Fisheriesagrees that it is important to verify these assumptions.In addition, NOAA Fisheries believes the populations of the bearded, ringed,and spotted seals and beluga whales also need to be better assessed, andthe status of these populations needs to be monitored. To assess and minimizethe possible adverse effects of offshore oil and gas exploration on theseanimals, studies need to be made to identify important habitat areas andto determine if noise or disturbance causes avoidance or abandonment oftraditional habitat areas. Existing data are not sufficient to predictthe effects of OCS exploration and development on seals particularly inthe Chukchi and Beaufort Sea waters.Based on the previous discussion, NOAA Fisheries makes the following specificconclusions regarding the proposed action.Impact on SpeciesNOAA Fisheries concludes that based on the best scientific informationavailable the effects of currently planned exploration will not adverselyaffect the species through effects on annual rates of recruitment or survivalif certain conditions are met. The conclusion of ``negligible impact''applies only to exploration, and does not apply to the development andproduction phases of oil and gas activity in the Beaufort and Chukchi Seas.The conditions are designed to eliminate interference with normal breedingand feeding patterns and migration to ensure that the effects remain negligible.First, a take of marine mammals would not be allowed in the Chukchi Seaand Beaufort Sea until the bowhead whale spring migration has passed Pt.Barrow. This would allow for the whales to use the spring lead system throughwhich they migrate without any interference from exploration activities.Although the petitioners have stated that they do not seek authorizationfor a take during this time, they reserve the option to do so if operationsbecome feasible. Also, they believe that if technology develops, drillingunits and support vessels could be in the area during the early open waterperiod while the subsistence hunt is in progress. Nonetheless, these activitiesare not included in the proposed authorization for an incidental take.Second, each activity would require a site-specific monitoring programapproved by NOAA Fisheries. The purpose of the program would be to monitorthe effects of the activity on marine mammals in that area.Third, findings for this exemption were based on the total level of activityestimated by the industry and MMS in its environmental impact statements.If the level of activity, including the number of trackline miles for seismicactivity, drilling units, and all the support vessels and aircraft associatedwith exploration, is more than the level estimated by industry and MMS,NOAA Fisheries will re-evaluate its findings to determine if they continueto be appropriate based on the higher level of activity. Depending on theresults of this evaluation, NOAA Fisheries could add further conditionsto the authorization or withdraw it.Impact on SubsistenceAlthough exploratory activities may occasionally place physical barriersbetween marine mammals and subsistence hunters (i.e. survey vessels andbarges traveling to exploration sites) and marine mammals may avoid certainstructures such as drillships, NOAA Fisheries concludes that these activitiesover the next 5 years are not likely to reduce the availability of thespecies to a level insufficient for a harvest to meet subsistence needsif certain conditions are met. We did not find any evidence that exploratoryactivities directly displaced hunters or caused marine mammals to abandonhunting areas.The conclusion that the activities will not have an ``unmitigable adverseimpact'' applies only to exploration, and does not apply to the developmentand production phases of oil and gas activity in the Beaufort and ChukchiSeas.The first condition concerns the spring migration of bowhead whales. Asdiscussed previously, a take would not be allowed until NOAA Fisherieshad determined that the spring migration of bowhead whales had passed Pt.Barrow. This would allow all the villages to participate in the springhunt without any interference from exploratory activities.Also, to lessen any possible effects concerning subsistence, NOAA Fisheriesbelieves it is necessary for the exploration industry to continue cooperativeefforts with villages that conduct subsistence hunts when exploration activitiesoccur in the same areas. Therefore, the second condition would requireapplicants for a Letter of Authorization to contact the subsistence communitiesto discuss potential conflicts and to identify in the application whatmeasures have been taken to minimize any adverse effects on the availabilityof marine mammals, especially the bowhead whale.Third, if there is evidence in the future that exploration activities arereducing the availability of marine mammals for subsistence, NOAA Fisherieswould revaluate its findings regarding subsistence and the measures requiredto ensure the availability of the species for subsistence. Depending onthe results of the evaluation, NOAA Fisheries could add further conditionsto the authorization or withdraw it.MonitoringThe purpose of a monitoring program is to determine the effects of explorationactivities on populations of marine mammals that inhabit the Arctic region.Ideally, monitoring programs should be designed to determine the direct,indirect and cumulative effects of offshore oil and gas exploration activitieson the survival and productivity of these species.Every applicant for a Letter of Authorization must submit a site-specificplan for monitoring the effects on the populations of marine mammals thatare present during exploratory activities. The plan, which must be approvedby NOAA Fisheries Service, must identify what survey techniques will beused to determine the movement and activity of the marine mammals nearthe exploratory sites. Qualified observers, approved by NOAA Fisheries,must monitor the behavior of the marine mammals present to determine theeffects. The requirements for monitoring plans will vary depending on theactivity, the location and the time. Not all monitoring plans will necessarilyrequire a researcher or biologist as an observer, and activities that arenot in areas known for the presence of marine mammals will require lessextensive monitoring plans. NOAA Fisheries will coordinate monitoring plansso that the information obtained during monitoring is gathered in a consistentmanner, and the information can be used to determine the cumulative impactsof exploration on marine mammals.Although sponsoring a research program is not a requirement for obtaininga Letter of Authorization, NOAA Fisheries encourages research programsthat would include (1) determinations of migration routes (especially bowheadwhales) and the age or size-specific survival and reproductive rates ofwhales, (2) identification and characterization of feeding areas and habitatuse and determination of their importance to the populations of marinemammals in the Arctic Region, (3) determination of the nature and effectsof industrial noise in the Arctic Region on marine mammals including geophysicalseismic sounds using airguns and drilling noise from both fixed and floatingunits and their support activities including icebreakers and dredges and(4) detection of cumulative effects.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Comments</ITAG>Those who favor NOAA Fisheries granting the oil companies an exemptionmentioned the considerable amount of information that has been developedfrom studies concerning the interactions of exploratory operations withwhales, and they believe this information indicates that exploratory operationshave a negligible impact on marine mammals, and they do not have an adverseimpact on the availability of the species for subsistence.Those who expressed concern regarding the granting of an exemption questionthe conclusions of the petitioners regarding the effects of energy explorationon marine mammals, especially bowhead whales, and the effects on the availabilityof the bowhead whale for subsistence. The major concern mentioned by mostcommentators is the lack of information on the cumulative effects of energyexploration on the bowhead and gray whale. Generally, they believe thatonly if research occurs concurrently with exploratory activities will changesbe detected. They believe that large-scale monitoring is the best methodof detecting cumulative effects of industrial activities over a numberof years.Several commentators believe that the petitioners should add other speciesof marine mammals to their request because these species are also likelyto be taken incidentally to these activities. Also, they felt the petitionersdid not address adequately the mitigation measures that the MMPA requiresif exploratory activities have an adverse impact on the availability ofthe bowhead whale for subsistence uses.NOAA Fisheries appreciates the many thoughtful comments regarding the requestfor comments and information, and took these comments into account whenpreparing the Environmental Assessment and the proposed regulations. Forexample, in the first request for more information (August 1988), NOAAFisheries suggested that the petitioners include four other species ofmarine mammals that we believe may be taken incidental to exploratory activities.These species are the beluga whale and the bearded, ringed and spottedseals. In February 1989, the petitioners agreed to this request. NOAA Fisheriesforwarded comments regarding the inclusion of polar bears and walrusesto the Fish and Wildlife Service which is conducting a review to determineif there will be a take of these species.NOAA Fisheries also asked for more information on the level of exploratoryactivities to allow a better assessment of the effects on the species andon the availability of the species for subsistence. Also, the petitionershave been encouraged to continue working with the Alaska native groupsto prevent in advance any adverse impact on the availability of the speciesfor subsistence.<ITAG tagnum="84">Classification</ITAG>NOAA Fisheries prepared an environmental assessment for this proposed rulemakingand concluded that there will be no significant impact on the human environmentas a result of this rule. A copy of the environmental assessment may beobtained at the address listed above.The Undersecretary for Oceans and Atmosphere, NOAA, determined that thisproposed rule is not a ``major rule'' requiring a regulatory impact analysisunder Executive Order 12291. The proposed regulations are not likely toresult in (1) an annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more;(2) a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individual industries,or government agencies; or (3) significant adverse effect on competition,employment, productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-basedenterprises to compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or exportmarkets.The General Counsel of the Department of Commerce certified to the SmallBusiness Administration that the proposed rule, if adopted, would not havea significant economic impact on a substantial number of small entitiessince only oil and gas exploration companies, which usually do not qualifyas small businesses, would be affected. As a result, a regulatory flexibilityanalysis was not prepared.This rule contains collection of information requirements subject to thePaperwork Reduction Act. In anticipation of this proposed rule, additionalrequirements were approved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB)under section 3504(b) of the Paperwork Reduction Act issued under OMB ControlNumber 0648-0151. Public reporting burden for this collection of informationis estimated to average 6 hours per response, including the time for reviewinginstructions, searching existing data sources, gathering and maintainingthe data needed, and completing and reviewing the collection of information.Send comments regarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of thiscollection of information, including suggestions for reducing this burden,to the National Marine Fisheries Service and OMB (see <T2>ADDRESSES</T2>). This rule does not contain policies with federalism implications sufficientto warrant preparation of a Federalism Assessment under E.O. 12612.NOAA Fisheries determined that this rule does not directly affect the coastalzone of any State with an approved coastal zone management program underthe Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA). This rule does not authorize oilexploration activities for which a consistency determination may be required.Rather, the rule authorizes the non-lethal taking of marine mammals incidentalto such activities. This determination will be submitted to the State ofAlaska's Division of Governmental Coordination for review under andSection;3.7 of the CZMA.<ITAG tagnum="74">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Ahmaogak, G., 1986. Integration of relevant data regarding potentialimpacts to the bowhead whale from contact with spilled oil. Attachmentto a May 13, 1986, letter to the Commissioners of Alaska Dept. of EnvironmentalConservation, Fish and Game, and Natural Resources. 24 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Albert, T.F. (ed.), 1981. Tissue structural studies and other investigationson the biology of endangered whales in the Beaufort Sea. Rpt. to the Bureauof Land Management from the Department of Veterinary Science, Universityof Maryland, College Park, Md., 20742. 953 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Braham, H.W., M.A. Fraker, and B.D. Krogman, 1980. Spring migrationof the Western Arctic population of bowhead whales. Mar. Fish. Rev. 42:36-46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Braithwaite, L.F., M.G. Aley, and D.L. Slater, 1983. The effects ofoil on the feeding mechanism of the bowhead whale. Final Report Preparedfor U.S. Dept. of the Interior under Contract No. AA851LT055. June 10,1983. 45 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Burns, J.J., 1967. The Pacific bearded seal. Alaska Dept. Fish andGame, Pittman-Robertson Proj. Rep. W-6-R and W-14-R, 66 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Burns, J.J., 1981. Bearded seal_<T3>Erignathus barbatus </T3>Erxleben, 1777. Pages 145-170 in S.H. Ridgwayand R.J. Harrison, eds. Handbook of marine mammals. Vol. 2 Seals, AcademicPress, New York.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Burns, J.J. and B.P. Kelly, 1982. Studies of ringed sealed in theAlaskan Beaufort Sea during winter: impacts of seismic exploration. Unpubl.annual report, OCSEAP Res. Unit 232 to U.S. Dept. of Commerce, Office ofMarine Pollution Assessment, Juneau, Alaska. 57 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Davis, R.A. and C.R. Evans, 1982. Offshore distribution and numbersof white whales in the eastern Beaufort Sea and Amundsen Gulf, summer 1981.Rep. prepared for SOHIO Alaska Petroleum Co., Anchorage, Alaska, and DomePetroleum Ltd., Calgary, Alberta, LGL Ltd. 76 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Davis, R.A. and D.H. Thompson, 1984. Marine mammals. Chapter 4 inThe Barrow Arch Environment and Possible Consequences of Planned OffshoreOil and Gas Development. Proceedings of a Synthesis Meeting. J.C. Truett,editor. OCSEAP/NOAA/OAD, Anchorage, Alaska pp. 47-80.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Finley, K.J. and R.A. Davis, 1984. Reactions of beluga whales andnarwhals to ship traffic and ice-breaking along ice edges in the easternCanadian High Arctic: 1982-1984. An overview. Rep. prepared for Can. Dept.Indian Affairs and Northern Development, Ottawa. LGS Limited, King City,Ontario, 42 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Fraker, M.A. and P.N. Fraker, 1979. White whale distribution and abundanceand the relationship to physical and chemical characteristics of the McKenzieEstuary. Can. Fish. Mar. Serv. Tech. Rep. 863. 59 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Fraker, M.A., D.E. Sargeant, and W. Hoek, 1978. Bowhead and whitewhales in the southern Beaufort Sea. Dept. Fish and Environment., Sidney,B.C., Beaufort Sea Tech. Rep. 4, 114 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Frost, K.J., L.L. Lowry, and J.J. Burns, 1987. Chapter 14. Ringedseal monitoring: RU 667. In: Chukchi Sea Information Update, D.A. Hale,editor. NOAA/NOS/OAD, Alaska Office, June 1987. pp. 87-96.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Frost, K.J., L.L. Lowry, and J.J. Burns, 1988a. Distribution, abundance,migration, harvest, and stock identify of belukha whales in the BeaufortSea. Chapter 4 in: Beaufort Sea Information Update, April 1988, P.R. Becker,editor, NOAA/NOS/OAD, Alaska office, June 1987. pp. 87-96.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Frost, K.J., L.L. Lowry, and J.J. Burns, 1988b. Ringed seals in theBeaufort Sea. Chapter 5 in: Beaufort Sea Information Update, April 1988,P.R. Becker, editor. NOAA/NOS/OAD, Alaska Office. pp. 41-50.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Geraci, J.R. and D.J. St. Aubin, 1982. Study of the effects of oilon cetaceans. Final Rept. U.S. Dept. Interior, Bureau of Land Management,Washington, DC 274 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Geraci, J.R. and D.J. St. Aubin, 1985. Expanded studies of the effectsof oil on cetaceans. Final Rept. Contract andplusmin;14-12-0001-29169 U.S.Dept. Interior, Minerals Management Service, Washington, DC 144 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Geraci, J.R. and D.J. St. Aubin, 1986. An assessment of the effectsof oil on bowhead whales <T3>Balaena mysticetus.</T3> Report submitted to Amoco Production Company,Anchorage, AK. 42 pp + appendices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Geraci, J.R. and T.G. Smith, 1975. Functional hematology of ringedseals in the Canadian Arctic. J. Fish. Res. Board, Canada 32:2559-2564.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Goodale, D.R., M.A. Hyman, and H.E. Winn, 1982. Cetacean responsesin association with the <T3>Regal Sword</T3> oil spill. Ch. XI In: A Characterization of MarineMammals and Turtles in the Mid and North Atlantic Areas of the U.S. OuterContinental Shelf. Cetacean and Turtle Assessment Program, Univ. RhodeIsland, Annual Report, 1979, For U.S. Dept. Interior, Bur. Land Manag.,Washington, DC, pp XI-1 to XI-15.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Hansen, D.J., 1985. The potential effects of oil spills and otherchemical pollutants on marine mammals occurring in Alaskan waters. OCSReport MMS 85-0031. Minerals Management Service, Anchorage, AK. 21 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Hazard, K., 1988. Beluga whale, <T3>Delphinapterus leucas. </T3>In Selected Marine Mammals of Alaska, SpeciesAccounts with Research and Management Recommendations. J.W. Lentfer, editor.Marine Mammal Commission, Washington, DC. pp 195-236.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">International Whaling Commission, In press. Report of the Subcommitteeon Protected Species and Aboriginal Subsistence Whaling.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Kelly, B.P. 1988a. Ringed Seal, <T3>Phoca hispida.</T3> In Selected Marine Mammals of Alaska, Species Accountswith Research and Management Recommendations. J.W. Lentfer, editor, MarineMammal Commission, Washington DC, pp. 57-76.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Kelly, B.P., 1988b. Bearded Seal, <T3>Erignathus barbatus.</T3> In Selected Marine Mammals of Alaska, SpeciesAccounts with Research and Management Recommendations. J.W. Lentfer, editor,Marine Mammal Commission, Washington DC, pp. 77-94.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Kelly, B.P., 1986. Ringed seal winter ecology and effects of noisedisturbance. Final rep., part 2, OCSEAP Res. Unit 232, to U.S. Dep Commerce,NOAA/NOS, Alaska Office, Anchorage, 91 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">LGL and Greeneridge Sciences Inc. 1987. Responses of bowhead whalesto an offshore drilling operation in the Alaskan Beaufort Sea, Autumn 1986.Draft Report prepared for Shell Western E andamp; P Inc. Anchorage, Alaska.368 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Ljungblad, D.K., S.E. Moore, and D.R. Van Schoik, 1983. Aerial surveysof endangered whales in the Beaufort, eastern Chukchi, and northern BeringSeas, 1982. Final Rpt: April October, 1982. Tech. Mem. 605, Naval OceanSystems Center, San Diego, CA. Prepared for Minerals Management Service,U.S. Department of the Interior.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Ljungblad, D.K., S.E. Moore, J.T. Clarke, and J.C. Bennett, 1987.Distribution, abundance, behavior, and bioacoustics of endangered whalesin the Alaskan Beaufort and Eastern Chukchi Seas, 1979-1986. NOSC Tech.Rep. 1177. prepared for MMS OCS Study. 187 pp. + appendices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Ljungblad, D.K., S.E. Moore, D.R. Van Schoik and C.S. Winchell. 1982.Aerial surveys of endangered whales in the Beaufort, Chukchi and northernBering Seas. NOSC TD 486, prepared for MMS Alaska OCS Office. 374 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Ljungblad, D.K., S.E. Moore, J.T. Clarke, D.R. Van Schoik, and J.C.Bennett, 1985a. Aerial surveys of endangered whales in the northern Bering,eastern Chukchi, and Alaskan Beaufort Seas, 1984: with a six year review.1979-1984. Tech. Rep. 1046, Naval Oceans Systems Center, San Diego, CA.,104 pp. + appendices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Ljungblad, D.K., S.E. Moore, J.T. Clarke, and J.C. Bennett, 1985b.Fall data summary: Endangered whale aerial surveys in the Chukchi and BeaufortSeas, 1985. SEACO, Inc., San Diego, CA. Prepared for Minerals ManagementService, Anchorage, AK. 8 pp + appendices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Ljungblad, D.K., B. Wursig, S.L. Swartz, and J.M. Keene. 1985c. Behavioralresponses of bowhead whales (<T3>Balaena mysticetus</T3>) elicited by close approaches of active geophysicalvessels in the Alaskan Beaufort Sea. Prepared for USDOI, MMS. San Diego,CA: Naval Ocean Systems Center.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Martin, F.B. 1986. The probability of a major oil spill from a BeaufortSea OCS exploratory blowout. Rept. submitted as Amoco Production CompanyWritten Testimony to State of Alaska Concerning Beaufort Sea Seasonal DrillingRestrictions. Amoco Production Company. 9 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Miles, P.R., C.I. Malme, and W.J. Richardson. 1987. Prediction ofdrilling site-specific interaction of industrial acoustic stimuli and endangeredwhales in the Alaskan Beaufort Sea. Rep. by BBN Laboratories Incorporated,Cambridge, MA for the Minerals Management Service, Anchorage, AK, UnderContract No. 14-12-0001-30295. OCS Study MMS 87-0084. 341 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Minerals Management Service, 1985. Scenario of Sale 109 EnvironmentalImpact Statement. Memorandum to Regional Director, Alaska OCS Region fromRegional Supervisor, Leasing and Environment, Dec. 19, 1985.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Minerals Management Service, 1987a. Chukchi Sea Sale 109 Draft EnvironmentalImpact Statement, MMS 87-0009. U.S. Department of the Interior, MineralsManagement Service, Alaska OCS Region.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Minerals Management Service, 1987b. Alaska outer continental shelfBeaufort Sea Sale 97. Final Environmental Impact Statement, MMS 87-0069.U.S. Department of the Interior, Minerals Management Service, Alaska OCSRegion.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Montague, J. 1985. Responses of endangered whales to offshore oilindustry activities. Paper presented at 6th Biennial Conference on theBiology of Marine Mammals, 22-26 November 1985, Vancouver, B.C. 8 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Moore, S.E., J.T. Clarke, and D.K. Ljungblad, 1986. A comparison ofgray whale (<T3>Eschrichtius robustus</T3>) and bowhead whale (<T3>Balaena mysticetus</T3>) distribution, abundance, habitat preferenceand behavior in the northeastern Chukchi Sea, 1982-1984. Rpt. Int. Whal.Comm. 36:273-279.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Murrell, T.L., J.R. Levine, J.B. Regg, and E.J. Tennyson. 1987. AlaskanOuter Continental Shelf oil-spill-response measures for offshore oil andgas operations. Rpt. prepared by Minerals Management Service. OCS Rpt.MMS 87-0062. 165 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Oliver, G.S., 1987. Marine Mammals. The Diapir Field Environment andPossible Consequences of Planned Offshore Oil and Gas Development. Proceedingsof a Synthesis Meeting. P.R. Becker, editor. OCSEAP/NOAA/OAD, Alaska Office.pp. 147-186.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Powers, A.D., 1987. Letter presenting statistics on the frequencyand probabilities of oil spills in the Alaskan OCS dated November 18, 1987from MMS to Rennie S. Holt, NMFS, 1825 Connecticut Avenue, NW., Washington,DC. 3 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Quakenbush, L.T., 1988. Spotted seal, <T3>Phoca largha.</T3> In Selected Marine Mammals of Alaska, Species Accountswith Research and Recommendations. J.W. Lentfer, editor. Marine MammalCommission, Washington DC. pp. 197-124.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Rice, D.W., A.A. Wolman, J.M. Breiwick, 1984. Gray whale, <T3>Eschrichitius robustus.</T3> In the status of endangered Whales, aspecial section of the Marine Fisheries Review, NOAA/NMFS, Seattle, Wash.pp. 7-14.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Richardson, W.J. (ed.), 1982. Behavior, disturbance responses anddistribution of bowhead whales <T3>Balaena mysticetus</T3> in the Beaufort Sea, 1980-81. Rpt. by LGL Ecol.Res. Assoc. Inc., Bryan, TX, for the U.S. Bureau of Land Management, Washington.456 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Richardson, W.J. (ed.), 1985. Behavior, disturbance responses anddistribution of bowhead whales <T3>Balaena mysticetus</T3> in the eastern Beaufort Sea, 1980-1984. OCSStudy MMS 85-0034, NTIS PB87-124376. Rpt. from LGL Ecol. Res. Assoc., Inc.,Bryan, TX, for Minerals Manage. Serv., Reston, VA. 306 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Richardson, W.J. (ed.), 1987. Importance of the Eastern Alaska BeaufortSea to feeding bowhead whales, 1985-1986. OCS Study MMS 87-0037. Rpt. fromLGL Ecol. Res. Assoc., Inc., Bryan, TX, for Minerals Manage. Serv., Reston,VA 547 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Richardson, W.J., and Greene, C.R., 1987. Noise and marine mammals.Pages 271-282 in P.R. Becker, ed. Proceedings of a synthesis meeting: theDiapir Field environment and possible consequences of planned offshoreoil and gas development; Chena Hot Springs, Alaska, January 1983. DOC/NOAA/OCSEAP_NationalOceans Service, Alaska Office, Anchorage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Richardson, W.J., C.R. Greene, and B. Wursig, 1985b. Behavior, disturbanceresponses and distribution of bowhead whales in the eastern Beaufort Sea,1980-1984: a summary. LGL Ecological Research Associates, Inc., Bryan,TX for U.S. Minerals Management Service, Reston, VA. 30 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Richardson, W.J., M.A. Fraker, B. Wursig, R.S. Wells, 1985c. Behaviorof Bowhead Whales <T3>Balaena mysticetus</T3> summering in the Beaufort Sea: Reactions toindustrial activities. Biol. Conserv. 32 (1985) 195-230.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Richardson, W.J., B. Wursig, and G.W. Miller. 1987. Bowhead distribution,numbers and activities. pp. 257-368 in Richardson, W.J. (ed). Importanceof the Eastern Alaskan Beaufort Sea to feeding bowhead whales, 1985-1986.Prepared for MMS, Reston VA. OCS MMS 87-0037.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Richardson, W.J., B. Wursig, G.W. Miller, and G. Silber, 1986. Bowheaddistribution, numbers and activities. pp. 146-218 in Richardson, W.J. (ed).Importance of the Eastern Alaskan Beaufort Sea to feeding bowhead whales,1985. LGL Ecological Research Associates, Inc. Prepared for MMS. RestonVA. OCS MMS 86-0026.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Smith, T.G. and J.R. Geraci, 1975. The effect of contact and ingestionof crude oil on ringed seals of the Beaufort Sea. Dept. Environ., Victoria,B.C., Beaufort Sea Tech. Rep. 5., 66 pp.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Thomson, D.H., 1986. Energetics of bowheads. pp 220-244 in Richardson,W.J. (ed). Importance of the Eastern Alaskan Beaufort Sea to feeding bowheadwhales, 1985. LGL Ecological Research Associates, Inc. Prepared for MMS,Reston, VA. OCS MMS 86-0026.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 50 CFR Part 228</ITAG>Marine mammals, Reporting, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 27, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">James E. Douglas, Jr.,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Assistant Administrator for Fisheries.</ITAG>For reasons set forth in the preamble, 50 CFR part 228 is proposed to beamended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 228_REGULATIONS GOVERNING SMALL TAKES OF MARINE MAMMALS INCIDENTALTO SPECIFIED ACTIVITIES</ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 228 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>16 U.S.C. 1371(a)(5).</ITAG>2. Subpart D is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart D_Taking of Marine Mammals Incidental to Oil and Gas ExplorationActivities in Alaska</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">228.31 Specified activity and specified geographical region.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">228.32 Effective dates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">228.33 Permissible methods.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">228.34 Prohibitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">228.35 Level of activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">228.36 Measures to ensure availability of species for subsistence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">228.37 Requirements for monitoring and reporting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">228.38 Letters of Authorization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart D_Taking of Marine Mammals Incidental to Oil and Gas ExplorationActivities in Alaska</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 228.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Specified activity and specified geographical region.</ITAG>Regulations in this subpart apply only to the incidental taking (by harassment)of marine mammals (bowhead, gray, and beluga whales and bearded, ringed,and spotted seals) by U.S. citizens engaged in oil and gas explorationin the Chukchi Sea or Beaufort Sea off the coast of Alaska. The geographicalregion includes Alaska state waters and outer continental shelf watersthat have been leased for exploration or that are being considered forleasing. The activities include geophysical surveys and exploratory drillingand support operations (e.g. ice-breakers, supply vessels and aircraft).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 228.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effective dates.</ITAG>Regulations in this subpart are effective for a 5-year period except forthe time each year when bowhead whales are migrating through the springlead system in the Chukchi Sea and Beaufort Sea. This period is approximatelyfrom mid-April through early June. Each year, the National Marine FisheriesService will determine when the spring migration of bowhead whales haspassed Pt. Barrow. The National Marine Fisheries Service will notify applicantswhen the migration is completed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 228.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Permissible methods.</ITAG>(a) The incidental, but not intentional, taking of whales by U.S. citizensholding a Letter of Authorization is permitted using the following methodsfor exploration:(1) Geophysical surveys including shallow hazard and acoustic surveys,and(2) Exploratory drilling including ice-breakers, support vessels and aircraft.(b) The methods and activities identified in andSection; 228.33(a) must beconducted in a manner that minimizes to the greatest extent possible anyadverse impacts on marine mammals, their habitat, and on the availabilityof these marine mammals for subsistences uses.(c) The National Marine Fisheries Service will evaluate each request fora Letter of Authorization based on the specific activity and the specificgeographical location. Each Authorization will identify allowable conditionsor methods that are specific to that activity and location.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 228.34</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibitions.</ITAG>(a) An incidental take of bowhead whales will not be allowed during theirspring migration in the Chukchi Sea and Beaufort Sea (see andSection; 228.32).(b) An incidental take other than by harassment will not be allowed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 228.35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Level of activity.</ITAG>When Letters of Authorization are requested each year, the National MarineFisheries Service will determine whether the level of activity identifiedin the requests exceeds that considered by the National Marine FisheriesService in making a finding of negligible impact on the species and a findingof no adverse impact on the availability of the species for subsistence.If the level of activity is higher, the National Marine Fisheries Servicewill re-evaluate its findings to determine if those findings continue tobe appropriate based on the higher level of activity. Depending on theresults of the evaluation, the National Marine Fisheries Service couldadd further conditions to the authorization or withdraw it.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 228.36</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Measures to ensure availability of species for subsistence.</ITAG>When applying for a Letter of Authorization, the applicant must identifywhat measures have been taken to minimize any adverse effects on the availabilityof marine mammals for subsistence uses if the activity takes place in ornear a traditional subsistence hunting area. The applicant must contactaffected subsistence whaling communities to discuss potential conflictswith the siting, timing, and methods of proposed operations. The applicantmust make reasonable efforts to assure that exploration activities do notinterfere with any subsistence hunt.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 228.37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for monitoring and reporting.</ITAG>(a) Holders of Letters of Authorization are required to cooperate withthe National Marine Fisheries Service and other designated Federal, State,or local agencies to monitor the impacts of oil and gas exploration onmarine mammals. The Holder must notify the National Marine Fisheries Service,Alaska Region, of any activities that may involve a potential take at least90 days prior to the activity in order to satisfy andSection; 228.37(d).(b) Holders of Letters of Authorization must designate a qualified individualor individuals to observe and record the effects of exploration activitieson marine mammals. The observer must be approved by the National MarineFisheries Service.(c) When applying for a Letter of Authorization, the applicant must includea site-specific plan to monitor the effects on populations of marine mammalsthat are present during exploratory activities. This plan, which must beapproved by the National Marine Fisheries Service, should identify whatsurvey techniques will be used to determine the movement and activity ofmarine mammals near the exploratory sites including migration and otherhabitat uses, such as feeding. A qualified researcher should observe thebehavior of the marine mammals present to determine if they are being affected.The monitoring program should document the acoustical effects on marinemammals and document or estimate the actual level of take. The requirementsfor monitoring plans will vary depending on the activity, the location,and the time.(d) At its discretion, the National Marine Fisheries Service may placean observer on board drillships, aircraft, etc. to monitor the impact ofexploration activities on marine mammals.(e) The holder of a Letter of Authorization must submit a report to theAssistant Administrator for Fisheries within 90 days of the completionof any exploratory activities. This report must include the following information:(1) Dates and types of activity;(2) Dates and locations of any activities related to monitoring the effectsof exploration on marine mammals;(3) Results of the monitoring activities including an estimate of the actuallevel of take; and(4) Results of behavioral, feeding, or population studies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 228.38</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Letters of authorization.</ITAG>(a) Each company conducting an exploratory activity in the geographicalarea described in andSection; 228.31 must apply for a Letter of Authorizationfor each geophysical survey or seismic activity and each drilling operation.The application must be submitted to the National Marine Fisheries Serviceat least 90 days before the activity is scheduled to begin.(b) When a company submits an application for a Letter of Authorization,it must include the following:(1) A plan to monitor the behavior and the effects of the activity on marinemammals;(2) A description of the measures taken to minimize any potential conflictsbetween the proposed activity and subsistence hunting; and(3) A description of the activity including the method to be used, thedates and duration of the activity, the specific location of the activityand the estimated area that will actually be affected by the exploratoryactivity.(c) In addition to the provisions of andSection; 228.6 (see General Regulations),any substantive modifications of the Letters of Authorization will be madeafter notice and opportunity for public comment.(d) The requirement for notice and public review in andSection; 228.38(c)will not apply if the National Marine Fisheries Service determines thatan emergency exists which poses a significant risk to the well-being ofthe species or stocks of marine mammals concerned.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-23209 Filed 10-2-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4310-55-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>